Hawaii statutes.
§171-12 Permanent register of applicants
for public lands. The board of land and natural resources shall establish
and maintain in each land district a register in which all persons desiring to
acquire public lands in the district may register. The board may require the
persons to submit information in writing and under oath to determine the
eligibility of any registrant to acquire such lands. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2;
Supp, §103A-12; HRS §171-12]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next